tests/ky-verbs2.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../tr-ky.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ky-tr.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] Infinitive -{U}{U}":
    бол<v><iv><ger><nom> : болуу
    сүй<v><tv><ger><nom> : сүйүү
    окшо<v><iv><ger><nom> : окшоо
    иште<v><iv><ger><nom> : иштөө
    саба<v><tv><ger><nom> : сабоо
    аарчы<v><tv><ger><nom> : аарчуу
    шиши<v><iv><ger><nom> : шишүү
    ат<v><tv><ger><nom> : атуу
    кет<v><iv><ger><nom> : кетүү

  "[twol] {I} deletion":
    бол<v><iv><prt_perf> : болуп
    сүй<v><tv><prt_perf> : сүйүп
    иште<v><iv><prt_perf> : иштеп

  "[twol] Yotification":
    кой<v><tv><prt_perf> : коюп
    кой<v><tv><ger><nom> : коюу

  "[lexc] Complex tenses":
    кой<v><tv><ger_pres><nom> : коюш
    кой<v><tv><neg><ger_pres><nom> : койбош
    кой<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : коёрмун
    кой<v><tv><neg><fut><p1><sg> : койбосмун
    кой<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : коёормун
    кой<v><tv><neg><fut><p1><sg> : койбоосмун
    кой<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : койдум
    кой<v><tv><neg><ifi><p1><sg> : койгон жокмун

  "[lexc] Volative participle":
    кой<v><tv><prt_vol><p1><sg> : койгум
    кой<v><tv><prt_vol><p2><sg> : койгуң
    кой<v><tv><prt_vol><p2><sg><frm> : койгуңуз
    кой<v><tv><prt_vol><p3><sg> : койгусу
    кой<v><tv><prt_vol><p1><pl> : койгубуз
    кой<v><tv><prt_vol><p2><pl> : койгуңар
    кой<v><tv><prt_vol><p2><pl><frm> : койгуңуздар
    кой<v><tv><prt_vol><p3><pl> : койгусу
    кет<v><iv><prt_vol><p1><sg> : кетким
    кет<v><iv><prt_vol><p2><sg> : кеткиң
    кет<v><iv><prt_vol><p2><sg><frm> : кеткиңиз
    кет<v><iv><prt_vol><p3><sg> : кеткиси
    кет<v><iv><prt_vol><p1><pl> : кеткибиз
    кет<v><iv><prt_vol><p2><pl> : кеткиңер
    кет<v><iv><prt_vol><p2><pl><frm> : кеткиңиздер
    кет<v><iv><prt_vol><p3><pl> : кеткиси
